Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.252

Excess levy authorized.

A mosquito control district shall have the power to levy additional taxes in excess of the constitutional and/or statutory limitations for any of the authorized purposes of such district, not in excess of fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value per year when authorized so to do by the electors of such district by a three-fifths majority of those voting on the proposition in the manner set forth in Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state, as amended by Amendment 59 and as thereafter amended at such time as may be fixed by the board of trustees for the district, which special election may be called by the board of trustees of the district, at which special election the proposition of authorizing such excess levy shall be submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "Yes" and those opposing thereto to vote "No". Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent holding the foregoing special election at the same time as that fixed for a general election.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 3; 1959 c 64 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates and termination dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.